Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.444, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Children getting on or off school bus. new text begin (a) new text end When a school bus is stopped on a street or highway, or other location where signs have been erected under section 169.443, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), and is displaying deleted text begin an extended stop-signal arm anddeleted text end flashing red lights, the driver of a vehicle approaching the bus deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end stop the vehicle at least 20 feet away from the bus. The vehicle driver deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not allow the vehicle to move until deleted text begin the school bus stop-signal arm is retracted anddeleted text end the red lights are no longer flashing. new text begin (b) A vehicle approaching a school bus displaying the prewarning flashing amber lights is thereby warned that continued movement is being terminated and that the flashing red lights are about to be exhibited when vehicular traffic must not encroach within 20 feet of the school bus. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end